New York, session 2025-2026, A2119.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 500-j of the correction law, as amended by chapter 2 291 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 500-j. Who may visit local correctional facilities. 1. The follow- 4 ing persons and their accompanying staff may visit, at their pleasure, 5 all local correctional facilities: The governor [and], lieutenant-gover- 6 nor, secretary of state, comptroller [and], attorney-general, members of 7 the legislature, judges of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme 8 court [and], county judges, and district attorneys [and every]. 9 2. The following persons and their accompanying staff may visit, at 10 their pleasure, the local correctional facilities located in the county 11 or city of their jurisdiction: the chief executive officer of a county, 12 members of a county legislative body, mayor of the city of New York, New 13 York city public advocate, New York city comptroller, and members of the 14 New York city council. 15 3. Every clergyman or minister, as such terms are defined in section 16 two of the religious corporations law, [having] may visit, at their 17 pleasure, the local correctional facilities located in the county or 18 city of which they have charge of a congregation [in the county in which 19 such facility is located]. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05549-04-5 A. 2119--A 2 1 4. No other person not otherwise authorized by law shall be permitted 2 to enter the rooms of a local correctional facility in which convicts 3 are confined, unless under such regulations as the sheriff of the coun- 4 ty, or in counties within the city of New York, the commissioner of 5 correction of such city, or in the county of Westchester, the commis- 6 sioner of correction of such county shall prescribe. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.